rules.xfst
clear
define MB "^" ;
define V [a | â | o ] ;
define InsertE [MB -> e || g _ V ] ;
define PutCedilla [ c MB -> ç ||  _  V ] ;
define DeleteMB [ MB -> 0 ] ;
regex InsertE ;
down mang^ons
down mang^ions
regex PutCedilla ;
down annonc^ions
down commenc^âmes
down annonc^ons
load vowel-alternations.fst
regex DeleteMB ;
turn stack
compose
